Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 43 Insurance on Multi-Unit Dwellings in Providence

34-43-1.
Insurance on multi-unit residential and commercial property.

Every landlord or lessor of residential or commercial property in the city of Providence shall file a written declaration in the office of the tax assessor of the city of Providence setting forth information regarding the insurance company insuring the property against loss or damage by fire. The declaration shall indicate the property location, the name of the insurance company or companies issuing the policy, the named insured and the policy number of the policy; the amount of insurance coverage provided in the policy; and the named insured and/or loss payee. The declaration shall be filed within ten (10) days of the landlord or lessor taking title to the property and within ten (10) days of the issuance of a new policy or amendment of the policy which amends any of the information contained in the declaration. The declaration shall also apply to all existing property as of June 27, 1986 and shall require filing of the information upon receipt of the first tax bill after June 27, 1986.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine of up to an amount not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both a fine and imprisonment. The city of Providence is hereby empowered to enforce the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any residential property occupied by the owner or owners thereof nor shall it apply to any residential property occupied by less than three (3) households.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 417, § 2.